Hawaii statutes.
§174C-6 Deputy to the chairperson of the
commission on water resource management. (a) There shall be a first
deputy to the chairperson of the commission on water resource management
("deputy for water resource management") who shall be in addition to
any other first deputy to the chairperson as the chairperson of the board of
land and natural resources. The deputy shall have experience in the area of
water resources and shall be appointed by the chairperson with the approval of
a majority of the commission.

(b) The duties of the deputy for water
resource management shall be to administer and implement, under the direction
of the commission, the state water code and all rules, and other directives
promulgated in accordance therewith by the commission. Nothing in this
provision shall be construed as limiting the authority of the commission as to
matters regarding water resources.

(c) The position of deputy for water resource
management is not subject to chapter 76.

(d) The salary of the deputy for water
resource management shall be as provided in section 26-53 for first deputies or
first assistants to the head of any department. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L
1992, c 87, §5; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next